New York, session 2025-2026, S1116.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 168-a of the executive law, as 2 amended by chapter 542 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. The following days shall be days of commemoration in each year: 5 January sixth, to be known as "Haym Salomon Day", January twenty-sev- 6 enth, to be known as "Holocaust Remembrance Day", February fourth, to be 7 known as "Rosa Parks Day", February fifteenth, to be known as "Susan B. 8 Anthony Day", February sixteenth, to be known as "Lithuanian Independ- 9 ence Day", February twenty-eighth, to be known as "Gulf War Veterans' 10 Day", March fourth, to be known as "Pulaski Day", March eighth, to be 11 known as "International Women's Day", March tenth, to be known as 12 "Harriet Tubman Day", March twenty-ninth, to be known as "Vietnam Veter- 13 ans' Day", April ninth, to be known as "POW Recognition Day", April 14 twentieth, to be known as "New York State Constitution Day", April twen- 15 ty-seventh, to be known as "Coretta Scott King Day", April twenty- 16 eighth, to be known as "Workers' Memorial Day", the first Tuesday in May 17 to be known as "New York State Teacher Day", May seventeenth, to be 18 known as "Thurgood Marshall Day", the first Sunday in June, to be known 19 as "Children's Day", June second, to be known as "Italian Independence 20 Day", June twelfth, to be known as "Women Veterans Recognition Day", 21 June nineteenth, to be known as "Juneteenth Freedom Day", June twenty- 22 fifth, to be known as "Korean War Veterans' Day", the second Monday in 23 July, to be known as "Abolition Commemoration Day", August twenty- 24 fourth, to be known as "Ukrainian Independence Day", August twenty- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02259-01-5 S. 1116 2 1 sixth, to be known as "Women's Equality Day", September eleventh, to be 2 known as "Battle of Plattsburgh Day" and also to be known as "September 3 11th Remembrance Day", September thirteenth, to be known as "John Barry 4 Day" and also to be known as "Uncle Sam Day in the State of New York", 5 September seventeenth, to be known as "Friedrich Wilhelm von Steuben 6 Memorial Day", the third Friday in September to be known as "New York 7 State POW/MIA Recognition Day" except if such date of commemoration 8 cannot be observed due to a religious holiday, such observances shall 9 then be conducted on the second Friday of September, the last Saturday 10 in September, to be known as "War of 1812 Day", the fourth Saturday of 11 September, known as "Native-American Day", the last Sunday in September, 12 to be known as "Gold Star Mothers' Day", October fifth, to be known as 13 "Raoul Wallenberg Day", October eleventh, to be known as "New Netherland 14 Day in the State of New York", October eighteenth, to be known as "Disa- 15 bilities History Day", October twenty-seventh, to be known as "Theodore 16 Roosevelt Day", November ninth, to be known as "Witness for Tolerance 17 Day", November twelfth, to be known as "Elizabeth Cady Stanton Day", the 18 third Tuesday in November to be known as "New York State School-Related 19 Professionals Recognition Day", November twenty-sixth, to be known as 20 "Sojourner Truth Day", November thirtieth, to be known as "Shirley 21 Chisholm Day", December third, to be known as "International Day of 22 Persons with Disabilities", December seventh, to be known as "Pearl 23 Harbor Day", December sixteenth, to be known as "Bastogne Day" and that 24 day of the Asian lunar calendar designated as new year to be known as 25 "Asian New Year". 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.